Ohio, session 136, SB193.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5534.609 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 5534.609. In addition to any other name prescribed i n 7
the Revised Code or otherwise, the northbound and southbound 8
lanes of state route number two hundred forty-one between 9
Nichols road and international parkway, in Summit county, shall 10
be known as the "Captain Joshua Michael McClimans Memorial 11
Highway." 12
The director of transportation may erect suitable markers 13
along the highway indicating its name. 14